Louisiana, session 2026, HB241.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 6:333(A)(12)(g) and (D) are hereby amended and reenacted to read
as follows:
§333. Disclosure of financial records; reimbursement of costs
A. As used in this Section:
* * *
(12) "Supervisory agency" means any entity which has statutory authority
to examine the financial condition, business operations, records, or transactions of
a bank, including but not limited to the following:
* * *
(g) The federal Office of Thrift Supervision Consumer Financial Protection
Bureau.
* * *
D. Service of a disclosure demand, or certified copy thereof, on any
customer shall be made by utilizing any applicable method for service of citation on
said the customer authorized by the Code of Civil Procedure, including Articles 1231
through 1265 1267. However, any such service may be made by an individual who
is not a party and who is at least eighteen years of age, rather than by the sheriff.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 241 ENROLLED
Service on any customer's counsel of record shall be made by personal service in the
office of such counsel of record on either his secretary, as defined in Code of Civil
Procedure Article 1235(C), or any partner or office associate of such counsel of
record. Service on a customer or on his counsel of record may be made within or
without the state of Louisiana.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.